Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2104
Out-of-state bank; powers; interstate merger
transaction; notice; powers and duties.

(1) An out-of-state bank may establish and
maintain a branch or acquire a branch in this state upon compliance with any
applicable requirements of the Business Corporation Act for registration or
qualification to do business in this state.

(2) An out-of-state
bank may engage in an interstate
merger transaction in
this state in which it is the resulting bank and establish one or more branches
in this state. The out-of-state bank shall notify the department of the proposed
interstate merger transaction involving a Nebraska state chartered bank within
fifteen days after the date it files an application for an interstate merger
transaction with its primary regulator.

(3) An out-of-state bank
may conduct only those activities at its branch or branches in this state
that are permissible under the laws of Nebraska or of the United States, except
that an out-of-state bank with trust powers may exercise all trust powers
in this state as a Nebraska bank with trust powers subject to the requirements
of section 8-209.

(4) All branches of an out-of-state
bank shall comply with all applicable Nebraska laws and regulations in the
conduct of their business in this state to the maximum extent authorized by
federal law.

Laws 1997, LB 351, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 1089, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB963, § 17.

Business Corporation Act, see section 21-2001.